Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2247.02
Resident, defined.

Resident means an individual who resides in a long-term care facility as a patient, resident, or client.

Laws 1992, LB 677, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 81-2246;

Laws 2018, LB903, § 11.
April 12, 2018